District of Columbia statutes.
9-632

Block party application and requirements.

(a)

The Department shall create a block party application and make it available for in-person pickup and through a Transportation Online Permitting System.

(b)

(1)

A District resident, 21 years or older, may submit a block party application and request a street closing for the purpose of holding a block party. The street closure shall:

(A)

Not be greater than one block;

(B)

Not last longer than 12 hours; and

(C)

End by 10 p.m.

(2)

All activity for a block party shall conclude by 10 p.m.

(c)

The block party application shall:

(1)

Be completed on the form provided by the Department;

(2)

Identify the street name and cross streets of the block to be closed; and

(3)

Include a list of at least 51% of the residents, owners, or businesses abutting the section of the street requested to be closed who have consented to the block party.

(d)

The applicant shall submit a completed block party application to the Department either online or in person.

History

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-190, § 3, 59 DCR 10163